Utah statutes.
26-8a-415.   Changes in ownership.

(1)  A licensed provider whose ownership or controlling ownership interest has changed shall submit information to the department, as required by department rule:

(a)  to establish whether the new owner or new controlling party meets minimum requirements for licensure; and

(b)  except as provided in Subsection (2), to commence an administrative proceeding to determine whether the new owner meets the requirement of public convenience and necessity under Section 26-8a-408.

(2)  An administrative proceeding is not required under Subsection (1)(b) if:

(a)  the change in ownership interest is among existing owners of a closely held corporation and the change does not result in a change in the management of the licensee or in the name of the licensee;

(b)  the change in ownership in a closely held corporation results in the introduction of new owners, provided that:

(i)  the new owners are limited to individuals who would be entitled to the equity in the closely held corporation by the laws of intestate succession had the transferor died intestate at the time of the transfer;

(ii)  the majority owners on January 1, 1999, have been disclosed to the department by October 1, 1999, and the majority owners on January 1, 1999, retain a majority interest in the closely held corporation; and

(iii)  the name of the licensed provider remains the same;

(c)  the change in ownership is the result of one or more owners transferring their interests to a trust, limited liability company, partnership, or closely held corporation so long as the transferors retain control over the receiving entity;

(d)  the change in ownership is the result of a distribution of an estate or a trust upon the death of the testator or the trustor and the recipients are limited to individuals who would be entitled to the interest by the laws of intestate succession had the transferor died intestate at the time of the transfer; or

(e)  other similar changes that the department establishes, by rule, as having no significant impact on the cost, quality, or access to emergency medical services.



Enacted by Chapter 141, 1999 General Session

